Washington statutes.
RCW 9.24.010

Fraud in stock subscription.

Every person who shall sign the name of a fictitious person to any subscription for or any agreement to take stock in any corporation existing or proposed, and every person who shall sign to any such subscription or agreement the name of any person, knowing that such person does not intend in good faith to comply with the terms thereof, or upon any understanding or agreement that the terms of such subscription or agreement are not to be complied with or enforced, shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 1909 c 249 s 386; RRS s 2638. Formerly RCW 9.44.090.]